waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX C Y 31
SFX C as      o               as
SFX C s       m               as
SFX C as      ą               as
SFX C as      uo              as
SFX C s       me              as
SFX C as      ie              [^k]as
SFX C as      ų               [^k]as
SFX C as      iems            [^k]as
SFX C as      uos             [^k]as
SFX C s       is              [^k]as
SFX C as      uose            [^k]as
SFX C s       io              ks
SFX C s       iam             ks
SFX C s       į               ks
SFX C s       iu              ks
SFX C s       iame            ks
SFX C s       ie              ks
SFX C s       ių              ks
SFX C s       iems            ks
SFX C s       ius             ks
SFX C s       iais            ks
SFX C s       iuose           ks
SFX C a       os              a
SFX C 0       i               a
SFX C a       ą               a
SFX C a       oje             a
SFX C a       ų               a
SFX C a       oms             a
SFX C 0       s               a
SFX C a       omis            a
SFX C a       ose             a

SFX D Y 168
SFX D as      o               as
SFX D as      ui              as
SFX D as      ą               as
SFX D as      u               as
SFX D as      e               [^ij]as
SFX D s       i               as
SFX D as      ų               as
SFX D s       ms              as
SFX D as      us              as
SFX D s       is              as
SFX D as      uose            as
SFX D ias     yje             ias
SFX D ias     y               ias
SFX D as      uje             jas
SFX D as      yje             jas
SFX D s       u               jas
SFX D s       o               [^djt]is
SFX D s       ui              [^djt]is
SFX D is      į               is
SFX D s       u               [^djt]is
SFX D is      yje             is
SFX D s       0               is
SFX D is      žio             dis
SFX D is      žiui            dis
SFX D is      žiu             dis
SFX D is      o               jis
SFX D is      ui              jis
SFX D is      u               jis
SFX D tis     čio             tis
SFX D tis     čiui            tis
SFX D tis     čiu             tis
SFX D ys      io              [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iui             [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      į               ys
SFX D ys      iu              [^djt]ys
SFX D s       je              ys
SFX D s       0               ys
SFX D ys      žio             dys
SFX D ys      žiui            dys
SFX D ys      žiu             dys
SFX D ys      o               jys
SFX D ys      ui              jys
SFX D ys      u               jys
SFX D tys     čio             tys
SFX D tys     čiui            tys
SFX D tys     čiu             tys
SFX D s       ai              [^djt]is
SFX D s       ų               [^djt]is
SFX D s       ams             [^djt]is
SFX D s       us              [^djt]is
SFX D s       ais             [^djt]is
SFX D s       uose            [^djt]is
SFX D is      žiai            dis
SFX D is      žių             dis
SFX D is      žiams           dis
SFX D is      žius            dis
SFX D is      žiais           dis
SFX D is      žiuose          dis
SFX D is      ai              jis
SFX D is      ų               jis
SFX D is      ams             jis
SFX D is      us              jis
SFX D is      ais             jis
SFX D is      uose            jis
SFX D tis     čiai            tis
SFX D tis     čių             tis
SFX D tis     čiams           tis
SFX D tis     čius            tis
SFX D tis     čiais           tis
SFX D tis     čiuose          tis
SFX D ys      iai             [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      ių              [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iams            [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      ius             [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iais            [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      iuose           [^djt]ys
SFX D ys      žiai            dys
SFX D ys      žių             dys
SFX D ys      žiams           dys
SFX D ys      žius            dys
SFX D ys      žiais           dys
SFX D ys      žiuose          dys
SFX D ys      ai              jys
SFX D ys      ų               jys
SFX D ys      ams             jys
SFX D ys      us              jys
SFX D ys      ais             jys
SFX D ys      uose            jys
SFX D tys     čiai            tys
SFX D tys     čių             tys
SFX D tys     čiams           tys
SFX D tys     čius            tys
SFX D tys     čiais           tys
SFX D tys     čiuose          tys
SFX D us      aus             us
SFX D s       i               us
SFX D us      ų               us
SFX D s       mi              us
SFX D s       je              us
SFX D s       j               us
SFX D us      au              us
SFX D us      ūs              [^ij]us
SFX D s       ms              [^ij]us
SFX D s       mis             [^ij]us
SFX D s       ose             us
SFX D us      ai              [ij]us
SFX D us      ams             [ij]us
SFX D us      ais             [ij]us
SFX D a       os              a
SFX D 0       i               a
SFX D a       ą               a
SFX D a       oje             a
SFX D a       oj              a
SFX D a       ų               a
SFX D a       oms             a
SFX D a       om              a
SFX D 0       s               a
SFX D a       omis            a
SFX D a       ose             a
SFX D os      ų               os
SFX D s       ms              os
SFX D s       m               os
SFX D os      as              os
SFX D s       mis             os
SFX D 0       e               os
SFX D ti      čios            ti
SFX D ti      čiai            ti
SFX D ti      čią             ti
SFX D ti      čia             ti
SFX D ti      čioje           ti
SFX D ti      čioj            ti
SFX D ti      čių             ti
SFX D ti      čioms           ti
SFX D ti      čiom            ti
SFX D ti      čias            ti
SFX D ti      čiomis          ti
SFX D ti      čiose           ti
SFX D 0       s               ė
SFX D ė       ei              ė
SFX D ė       ę               ė
SFX D ė       e               ė
SFX D 0       je              ė
SFX D 0       j               ė
SFX D ė       ių              [^dt]ė
SFX D ė       žių             dė
SFX D tė      čių             tė
SFX D 0       ms              ė
SFX D 0       m               ė
SFX D ė       es              ė
SFX D 0       mis             ė
SFX D 0       se              ė
SFX D ės      ių              [^dt]ės
SFX D tės     čių             tės
SFX D ės      žių             dės
SFX D s       ms              ės
SFX D ės      es              ės
SFX D s       mis             ės
SFX D 0       e               ės
SFX D ai      ų               ai
SFX D i       ms              ai
SFX D ai      us              ai
SFX D 0       s               ai
SFX D ai      uose            ai
SFX D ūs      ų               ūs
SFX D ūs      ums             ūs
SFX D ūs      us              ūs
SFX D ūs      umis            ūs
SFX D ūs      uose            ūs
