waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
Adomava/D
Aidė/D
Akvilė/D
Aleksandruvka/D
Aliaska/D
Almonė/D
Ambraziškiai/D
Andrėja/D
Antaliedė/D
Antkalnis/D
Apidėmės/D
Arglaičiai/D
Artmaniškis/D
Ataukai/D
Augminė/D
Aukštamiškis/D
Austranija/D
Ašmena/D
Ažutakis/D
Bagdoniškė/D
Balaganai/D
Baltamiškis/D
Balčiūniškis/D
Barbadosas/D
Baroniškiai/D
Barvainas/D
Baukiai/D
Beinašilis/D
Benediktavas/D
Bernočiai/D
Besmerčiai/D
Bildūnai/D
Birutis/D
Blavaščiūnas/D
Bogušis/D
Brazinskiai/D
Brukos/D
Budrėnai/D
Bukonys/D
Burbos/D
Butginas/D
Buvainė/D
Būda/D
Ceveikiškė/D
Dabravolė/D
Daktoriai/D
Daniliauskas/D
Dargiškė/D
Datūniškis/D
Daugirdėliai/D
Daujėnai/D
Daupeliai/D
Degsnė/D
Derviniai/D
Dieveniškės/D
Dirdos/D
Domantė/D
Dovilė/D
Drucminai/D
Dubriai/D
Duobikė/D
Dvarykščius/D
Dūkiškės/D
Egliniai/D
Eidvainas/D
Eigydė/D
Eiskudžiai/D
Eivilas/D
Elzė/D
Ersla/D
Fasas/D
Franciškis/D
Gaidžiai/D
Gaižūnai/D
Galkiškės/D
Garbšiai/D
Gaubtys/D
Gavėnonys/D
Geidutis/D
Geranimova/D
Giegždai/D
Giralė/D
Gižiemiai/D
Graužinkai/D
Griniškiai/D
Gudbergiškis/D
Gurstiškė/D
Iciūnai/D
Ireniškiai/D
Jakimavičiai/D
Jasiškės/D
Jevgenija/D
Joniškės/D
Judriškė/D
Juodraistis/D
Justė/D
Kalančiai/D
Kamičiūnai/D
Karakurai/D
Karčemkos/D
Kaupiškiai/D
Keižonys/D
Keturiai/D
Kintautė/D
Klaudijus/D
Kneiželiai/D
Krapštikiai/D
Krivašiūnai/D
Kudriai/D
Kunigėliai/D
Kuzliškė/D
Kūdros/D
Lalėnai/D
Lauksmis/D
Legaudas/D
Lesčiukai/D
Lieporai/D
Lipliūnai/D
Lolita/D
Lygimantas/D
Majoriškė/D
Manius/D
Margis/D
Maslikovka/D
Mažėliai/D
Mekšėniškis/D
Michaluvka/D
Mikieriai/D
Miltarė/D
Mirgai/D
Momakalnis/D
Mėdžiūnai/D
Narkuškės/D
Nausėda/D
Nelė/D
Nerė/D
Norfolkas/D
Nuomininkai/D
Ožkelaičiai/D
Padarbai/D
Pagaršvys/D
Pailgotis/D
Pakertušė/D
Paleiškuonys/D
Pamarnakis/D
Papelekis/D
Paročkė/D
Patašinė/D
Pavasarėliai/D
Pašekščiai/D
Peiksva/D
Petrauskynė/D
Piktožiai/D
Plaviškės/D
Polinezija/D
Prekeliškės/D
Puodiškės/D
Pučkuriai/D
Radvoniškis/D
Ramonas/D
Raugališkis/D
Ribickis/D
Rinkantė/D
Rubikaliai/D
Rupšiai/D
Sabaliauskienė/D
Samapolė/D
Saugailas/D
Sendzikai/D
Silgiškis/D
Skaisčiūnai/D
Skodiškės/D
Sliekiškiai/D
Somalilandas/D
Staneliai/D
Steponiškės/D
Strėva/D
Sutkai/D
Sėleniai/D
Tarutlaukė/D
Teberešiškiai/D
Tolbaudas/D
Treputiškis/D
Tumšai/D
Unguriai/D
Uždubysys/D
Užusaliai/D
Vaigauda/D
Vaiveriškiai/D
Valeras/D
Varlakojai/D
Vedriai/D
Versmynas/D
Vieštovėnai/D
Vilkaslastis/D
Virbaliūnai/D
Vitkai/D
Vydenė/D
Vėderiškiai/D
Zanaviečiai/D
Zubeliai/D
abejokia/C
abejoks/C
afazija/D
akivaizdininkas/DN
aliejus/D
ana/C
anas/C
anatomė/D
anokia/C
anoks/C
antkulnis/D
apačia/D
aprašymas/D
apytamsa/D
aromatas/D
atgyvena/D
atsaja/D
audinė/D
autoinspektorė/D
ašarotekis/D
baldininkas/D
bandiklis/D
baubas/D
benzinvežis/D
biokuras/D
blužnutė/D
brokeris/D
buolė/D
cementvežis/D
citrinmedis/D
danajė/D
davinėtoja/D
demagogas/D
dešragalys/D
diktatorius/D
divizija/D
dravidas/D
dujokaukė/D
dvarponė/D
dzūkas/D
eiliakalė/D
elektoratas/D
erčia/D
fakyras/D
finalininkė/D
frantas/D
galiūnė/D
garomatis/D
gelmėlaivis/D
giedra/D
gleiviabudė/D
graižas/D
grifas/D
grūstuvis/D
gyrūnas/D
heroinas/D
ieva/D
indoiranėnas/D
interventas/D
išdvasa/D
išlėkis/D
išvengiamybė/DN
jokia/C
joks/C
jonpapartis/D
juristė/D
kaišiadoriškis/D
kalvagūbris/D
kanonierė/D
karingumas/DN
kas/CN
kaselė/D
katra/C
katras/C
kačiukas/D
kažkas/C
kažkatra/C
kažkatras/C
kažkokia/C
kažkoks/C
keptuvė/D
kiauražaizdė/D
kinrožė/D
kita/CD
kitokia/C
kitoks/C
klampynas/D
klostas/D
kokia/CN
koklis/D
koks/CN
kompromitacija/D
konvalija/D
kragas/D
krevetė/D
kryžmė/D
kuolinga/D
kvantavimas/D
laborantė/D
lalesys/D
lazdijiškis/D
lenkmetis/D
ligustras/D
liuteris/D
lydkrosnė/D
maigūnas/D
malūnininkė/D
maskatė/D
mažytė/D
melsvė/D
metėlė/D
militarizmas/D
miškinis/D
mopsas/D
musonas/D
nacionalsocialistė/D
naujarodietis/D
nenaudas/D
nevarėniškis/D
norvegė/D
nuojauta/D
nusigyvenėlis/D
ofortas/D
ornamentika/D
padarynė/D
paiša/D
pakulnis/D
pamatas/D
paprastuolis/D
parsidavėlis/D
paskenduolis/D
patauška/D
pavydulys/D
pedantas/D
perdaras/D
persvara/D
pievelė/D
pilvakalbystė/D
pjausnys/D
pleneras/D
plynledis/D
poligrafininkė/D
posėdis/D
pranašė/D
presuotojas/D
priespauda/D
priteklius/DN
protautojas/D
pumpurė/D
pusiaudienis/D
putinas/D
radiacija/D
raktas/D
raugalė/D
reformistas/D
reostatas/D
riedulys/D
romantizmas/D
rykštenė/D
sabalas/D
sampilas/D
saudoarabas/D
savitarpis/D
semitas/D
setas/D
sinchronija/D
skaičiuotojas/D
skerspūtys/D
skreperininkė/D
skėstuvas/D
smalžys/D
snučas/D
spektrograma/D
spygsynė/D
stauridė/D
stirta/D
stula/D
sulfatas/D
sutuoktinė/D
sąauga/D
sūdytojas/D
ta/CN
tandemas/D
tarpuplautis/D
tas/CN
teikėja/D
termitas/D
tiražuotojas/D
tokia/CDN
toks/CN
tramplinas/D
trikdytoja/D
trumparegis/BDNU
tuščiažodystė/D
tęstinumas/D
uostytoja/D
užkalas/D
užsaulis/D
vagilė/D
vaitulys/D
valstybininkas/D
vargšas/D
varžybininkas/D
veldėtoja/D
vertelga/D
viendienis/D
vienokia/C
vienoks/C
vila/D
virtalius/D
visa/CN
visokia/C
visoks/C
vištašunis/D
vyrystė/D
yla/D
Čedasai/D
Čiuteikiai/D
čiupeklis/D
įkamša/D
įstatas/D
Šaltabarščiai/D
Šeimyniškėliai/D
Šilgališkiai/D
Šlamai/D
Šukeliškė/D
Šūkleliai/D
šapas/D
šerniūkštis/D
šilokas/D
šiokia/C
šioks/C
šita/CD
šitas/C
šitokia/C
šitoks/C
šlapimas/D
šniurkšlys/D
šungaudė/D
šviestuvas/D
ūžautojas/D
Žažačiai/D
Žilviškės/D
Žvalgaičiai/D
žabarija/D
žarotūnė/D
žiburėlis/D
žioveinis/D
žuviena/D
žydė/D
